Mississippi, session 2026, SB2811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, the term "dwelling house" means any building or structure used and occupied for human habitation or intended to be so used, including, but not limited to, residential houses, apartments or manufactured homes. The term does not include the common law precept of curtilage. (2)  In addition to any other prohibitions which may exist by other law, it shall be unlawful for any person to shoot or discharge any firearms: (a)  Across or in any public road in this state, at any time; (b)  Within five hundred (500) feet of any school or church; or (c)  Within five hundred (500) feet of any dwelling house unless the person who discharges a firearm under this paragraph is a resident of a dwelling house, and or an authorized guest of a dwelling house, and shoots or discharges a firearm in a lawful manner within five hundred (500) feet of the dwelling house where the person lives or is an authorized guest, if the firearm is being discharged with the express or implied knowledge and consent of all residents of that dwelling house, and no other dwelling houses are located within five hundred (500) feet of where the firearm is discharged; or (d)  In any state, county or municipal park in areas of which the discharge of firearms is prohibited. (3)  Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned in jail for not more than one hundred (100) days, or both fined and imprisoned. (4)  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, any person operating a gun repair shop or firearm store, licensed to do business in the state and duly licensed under applicable federal statutes, shall be exempt from the prohibition established by this section for the purpose of test firing a firearm.  The director of the Department of Public Safety shall prescribe the rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the exemption under this subsection and shall ensure that any person residing in any dwelling house within five hundred (500) feet of such gun repair shop or firearm store be given an opportunity to protest the granting of such exemption. (5)  The provisions of this section are not applicable to indoor shooting ranges the owner or operator of which holds all necessary and required licenses where the shooting range is in compliance with all applicable state, county, municipal laws, rules or ordinances regulating the design and operation of such facilities. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.